Utah statutes.
57-19-14.   Registration of salesperson.

(1)  Unless the transaction is exempt under Section 57-19-26, it is unlawful for any person to act as a salesperson marketing a project in this state without first registering under this chapter as a salesperson.

(2)  The fee for registration as a salesperson is waived by the division for persons licensed by the division under Title 61, Chapter 2f, Real Estate Licensing and Practices Act.

